Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-106
Tax Commissioner; examination and
audit of books of Auditor of Public Accounts; report to Governor and Clerk
of the Legislature.

The Tax Commissioner shall annually examine
and audit or supervise and direct the examination and audit of the books,
accounts, vouchers, records, and expenditures of the office of Auditor of
Public Accounts and report promptly to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature
the result of such examination and audit. The
report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. Each
member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such
report by making a request for it to the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1929, c. 51, § 6, p. 211;

C.S.1929, § 81-106;

Laws 1933, c. 96, § 15, p. 394;

Laws 1941, c. 180, § 6, p. 703;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-106;

Laws 1943, c. 216, § 1, p. 710;

R.S.1943, § 81-106;

Laws 1951, c. 310, § 1, p. 1063;

Laws 1955, c. 231, § 14, p. 724;

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 28, p. 1714;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 39;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 164.

Legislative purpose, Department of Administrative Services, see section 81-1101.